Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB767.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 6140YC (3) 91 jm/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 423.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 111. a. The sales price of tangible 3 personal property or specified digital products sold or 4 services furnished before, during, or after the site 5 preparation, construction, reconstruction, replacement, 6 alteration, repair, safe storage, maintenance, or restarting 7 after decommissioning of a nuclear electric generation 8 facility. 9 b. This exemption does not apply to the following: 10 (1) Motor vehicles subject to registration under chapter 11 321. 12 (2) Tangible personal property or specified digital 13 products sold, or services furnished where the purchasing agent 14 of the nuclear electric generation facility fails to provide 15 the retailer with an exemption certificate. 16 (3) Tangible personal property or specified digital 17 products sold, or services furnished prior to January 1, 2025. 18 c. This subsection shall not be construed to limit any other 19 exemptions applicable under this chapter. 20 d. The department shall issue guidance within ninety 21 days of the effective date of this Act regarding acceptable 22 documentation for exemption qualification and exemption 23 certificate procedures. 24 e. The department may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 25 to administer this subsection. 26 f. For purposes of this subsection, ânuclear electric 27 generation facilityâ means a facility commencing or restarting 28 commercial operations on or after January 1, 2028, that is 29 located in this state, uses nuclear fission, fusion, or other 30 nuclear processes to generate electricity for sale or for use 31 in the transmission or distribution grid and is licensed by 32 the federal nuclear regulatory commission. A ânuclear electric 33 generation facilityâ includes facilities undergoing restart 34 after a decommissioning period and facilities in advanced 35 -1- LSB 6140YC (3) 91 jm/jh 1/ 4 H.F. _____ stages of development or obtaining federal licensing from 1 the United States nuclear regulatory commission. A ânuclear 2 electric generation facilityâ includes all of the following: 3 (1) Nuclear reactors, reactor fuel cores, reactor vessels, 4 steam generators, heat exchangers, turbine systems, control 5 rods, instrumentation, cooling systems, fuel handling and 6 storage systems, radiation shielding, radiation sources and 7 other primary nuclear generation components, and spent fuel 8 storage. 9 (2) Structures and buildings housing nuclear generation 10 systems, including containment buildings, auxiliary buildings, 11 cooling towers, water intake or discharge structures, and 12 on-site storage facilities directly related to nuclear 13 operations. 14 (3) Electrical generation and transformation equipment, 15 including turbines, generators, switchgear, transformers, 16 inverters, transmission structures, conductors, substations, 17 and associated power conditioning and control equipment. 18 (4) Equipment and systems used for safety, security, 19 radiation monitoring, emergency power, operator training, 20 maintenance training, safety-related equipment storage, and 21 warehousing. 22 (5) Environmental protection required for operation of the 23 facility. 24 (6) System materials, components, equipment, storage, 25 structures, and buildings associated with integrated systems 26 that enhance the flexibility of the system in delivering energy 27 to the electrical grid, including but not limited to the 28 following: 29 (a) Systems that store and utilize thermal energy or 30 electrical energy from the nuclear electric generating facility 31 prior to delivering energy to the grid. 32 (b) Energy storage systems that utilize a transmission 33 system interconnection to the same physical substation as the 34 nuclear electric generating facility. 35 -2- LSB 6140YC (3) 91 jm/jh 2/ 4 H.F. _____ (7) Materials, supplies, and components permanently 1 incorporated into or consumed in the construction, repair, or 2 maintenance of a nuclear electric generation facility. 3 (8) Digital control systems, software, cybersecurity, 4 infrastructure, and physical security systems and equipment 5 used in the safe and compliant operation of the nuclear 6 electric generation facility. 7 (9) Equipment, materials, systems, and services required to 8 restart operations at a previously operational nuclear electric 9 generation facility that has ceased commercial operation, 10 including but not limited to refurbishment, modernization, 11 regulatory compliance upgrades, and relicensing activities. 12 Sec. 2. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 13 retroactively to January 1, 2025, for qualifying tangible 14 personal property or specified digital products sold, or 15 services furnished on or after that date. 16